ja: フットボード取り付けタイプ: ボルトオン; 自立式; フックオン; スロットイン; ユニバーサル; その他
ko: 발판 장착형: 볼트온; 프리스탠딩; 후크온; 슬롯인; 범용; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul de montare a tălpii pedalei: Cu șurub; Independent; Cu prindere; Cu inserare; Universal; Altele
da: Monteringstype for fodplade: Fastboltet; Fritstående; Med kroge; Indstik; Universal; Andet
lt-LT: Lovos kojūgalio tvirtinimo tipas: Prisukamas varžtais; Laisvai pastatomas; Pakabinamas kabliukais; Įkišamas; Universalus; Kita
de: Montageart des Fußbretts: Zum Anschrauben; Freistehend; Zum Einhängen; Zum Einstecken; Universell; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de montaje del reposapiés: Atornillable; Independiente; Enganchable; Encajable; Universal; Otro
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt ván chân giường: Bắt vít; Đứng tự do; Gắn móc; Khe cắm; Phổ quát; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže stopalke: Pritrditev z vijaki; Prostostoječe; Na zatik; Na vstavitev; Univerzalno; Drugo
ru: Тип крепления подножки: На болтах; Отдельно стоящий; На крючках; Вставной; Универсальный; Другое
nl: Type voetbordmontage: Vastgeschroefd; Vrijstaand; Inhaakbaar; Inschuifbaar; Universeel; Overige
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на таблата за крака: С болтове; Свободностояща; С куки; На плъзгане; Универсален; Друг
en: Footboard mounting type: Bolt-on; Free-standing; Hook-on; Slot-in; Universal; Other
cs: Způsob upevnění podnožky: Šroubovací; Volně stojící; Závěsné; Zásuvné; Univerzální; Jiné
it: Tipo di montaggio della pediera: Imbullonato; A libera installazione; A gancio; A incastro; Universale; Altro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งแผ่นปิดปลายเตียง: ขันน็อตยึด; ตั้งอิสระ; เกี่ยวล็อก; สล็อตอิน; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
nb: Monteringstype for fotbrett: Bolt-på; Frittstående; Hektes på; Skyves inn; Universell; Annet
el: Τύπος στερέωσης ποδοστροφέα: Με βίδες; Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Με γάντζους; Με εγκοπές; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pl: Typ montażu podnóżka: Na śruby; Wolnostojący; Na haczyki; Wsuwany; Uniwersalny; Inny
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem com estribo: Parafusada; Autônoma; Engatada; Encaixada; Universal; Outra
fr: Type de fixation par marchepied: À boulonner; Autoportant; À crochets; À emboîter; Universel; Autre
zh-CN: 脚踏板安装类型: 螺栓固定; 独立式; 挂钩式; 插入式; 通用; 其他
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia nášľapnej dosky: Priskrutkované; Voľne stojace; Zahákovacie; Zasúvacie; Univerzálne; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže podnožja: Montaža vijcima; Samostojeće; Montaža kukama; Utorno; Univerzalno; Ostalo
sv: Monteringstyp för fotplatta: Bultad; Fristående; Hakmonterad; Insticksfäste; Universell; Övrigt
fi: Jalkapäädyn kiinnitystyyppi: Pultattava; Vapaasti seisova; Koukkukiinnitteinen; Urakiinnitteinen; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do estribo: Aparafusado; Independente; De encaixe; Ranhurado; Universal; Outro
hu: Lábtartó rögzítési módja: Csavarozható; Szabadon álló; Akasztható; Becsúsztatható; Univerzális; Egyéb
tr: Ayak ucu paneli montaj tipi: Cıvatalı; Ayaklı; Kancalı; Geçmeli; Evrensel; Diğer
zh-TW: 床尾板安裝類型: 螺栓固定式; 獨立式; 掛鉤式; 插入式; 通用; 其他